New York, session 2025-2026, S4737.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The civil service law is amended by adding a new section 2 55-d to read as follows: 3 § 55-d. Ensuring language assistance services by state agencies. 1. 4 Every state agency shall provide language assistance services to all 5 limited English proficient individuals so as to ensure that all such 6 individuals who cannot speak, read, write or understand the English 7 language with the proficiency necessary for adequate communication with 8 agency personnel have effective access to the agency's programs and 9 services. Every state agency shall ensure that all individuals provid- 10 ing language assistance services to limited English proficient individ- 11 uals have sufficient fluency in both English and the relevant language 12 to communicate information necessary for such individual to access 13 services. Language assistance services for primary and non-primary 14 languages shall be available at all agency locations open for public 15 business, and shall, to the extent practicable, be provided in person. 16 Translation of all frequently used forms and other written materials 17 that are essential to access agency services shall be available in all 18 of the agency's primary languages. The president shall develop and 19 implement a comprehensive language assistance plan that establishes 20 uniform policies and procedures for providing language assistance 21 services by all state agencies, including procedures for documenting the 22 provision of or refusal of language assistance services, and that 23 requires training to ensure that all staff who have contact with limited 24 English proficient individuals comply with the plan. Such person provid- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09456-01-5 S. 4737 2 1 ing language assistance services may be a qualified interpreter, volun- 2 tary worker or other personnel currently employed by the agency. 3 2. All state agencies shall provide written notice as to the avail- 4 ability of language assistance services, including oral interpretation 5 and translations of forms and other materials. Notice of availability of 6 language assistance services shall also be posted in conspicuous agency 7 locations open for public business in all primary languages. 8 3. All state agencies shall maintain a record of the primary languages 9 spoken by any individual seeking or receiving language assistance 10 services at such agency. Such information shall be recorded whether or 11 not such individual actually obtains such service. 12 4. (a) All state agencies shall submit to the president an annual 13 report assessing its compliance with the requirements of this section. 14 The report shall identify the primary languages used by the public, and 15 the percentage of the agency's interaction with the public who speak 16 each primary language. 17 (b) All state agencies shall maintain a record of the foreign language 18 primarily spoken by any individual seeking or receiving language assist- 19 ance services at the agency. Such information shall be recorded whether 20 or not such individual actually obtains services. 21 (c) The department shall submit to the governor and to the legisla- 22 ture, on or before, March first of each year, a written report on agency 23 compliance with the requirements of this section. The report shall also 24 compile agency findings and identify the primary languages used by the 25 public, and the percentage of overall agency interaction with the public 26 who speak each primary language. This report shall also include individ- 27 ual agency report submissions as required in this section. 28 5. The president shall promulgate such rules and regulations as may be 29 necessary and proper to implement the provisions of this section, which 30 shall include the methodology to be used by agencies in determining 31 primary languages. 32 6. For the purposes of this section: (a) "primary language" means a 33 language other than English that is either (i) used to communicate, 34 during at least five percent of public visits in a year, by individuals 35 of the public who cannot speak, read, write or understand the English 36 language at the level of proficiency necessary for effective communi- 37 cation with agency officials; or (ii) spoken by non-English speaking 38 individuals comprising more than five percent of the agency service area 39 population, as calculated by using demographic information available 40 from the United States bureau of the census; 41 (b) "state agency" means any state department, board, bureau, divi- 42 sion, commission, committee, council, office or other governmental enti- 43 ty performing a governmental or proprietary function for the state, 44 except for the judiciary or the state legislature. 45 (c) "language assistance services" means interpretation and trans- 46 lation services either orally or in writing. 47 (d) "limited English proficient individual" means a person who identi- 48 fies as being or is unable to speak, read or write the English language 49 at a level that permits such person to interact effectively with an 50 agency. 51 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 52 it shall have become a law.